Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2913
Association; administrative fee; computation; forms; failure to remit fee; rescind license; procedure; appeal.

(1) Every association incorporated pursuant to the Nebraska Hospital and Physicians Mutual Insurance Association Act shall, on or before March 1 of each year, pay an administrative fee to the director in the amount of three-tenths of one percent of the gross amount of direct writing premiums received by it during the preceding calendar year for business done in this state.

(2) The computation of the administrative fee shall be made on forms furnished by the Department of Insurance and shall be forwarded to the department together with a sworn statement by an appropriate officer of the company attesting the accuracy of the fee computation. The department shall furnish such forms prior to the end of the year for which the fees are payable.

(3) The director shall rescind or refuse to reissue the license of any association which fails to remit the administrative fee in conformity with the provisions of this section. Prior to rescinding such license, the director shall issue an order to the association directing the association to show cause why such rescission should not be made. The director shall give not less than ten days' notice of a rescission hearing before the department. Should the company be aggrieved by such determination, an appeal may be taken, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 13;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 67.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.